apertium-rus-ukr.ukr.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 1116
	Sdefs: 63
	Paradigms: 126
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools fix apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix out.dix

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>АБВГҐДЕЄЖЗИІЇЙКЛМНОПРСТУФХЦЧШЩЮЯЬабвгґдеєжзиіїйклмнопрстуфхцчшщюяь</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" 	c="іменник"/> 
    <sdef n="adj" 	c="Прикметник"/> 
    <sdef n="abbr" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="f" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="m" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="nt" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="mf"  c=""/> 
    <sdef n="mn"  c=""/> 
    <sdef n="mfn" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="aa"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="an"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="nn"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="однина"/> 
    <sdef n="pl" 	c="множина"/> 
    <sdef n="nom" 	c="називний"/> 
    <sdef n="gen" 	c="родовий"/> 
    <sdef n="dat" 	c="давальний"/> 
    <sdef n="acc" 	c="знахідний"/> 
    <sdef n="ins" 	c="орудний"/> 
    <sdef n="loc" 	c="місцевий"/> 
    <sdef n="voc" 	c="кличний"/> 
    <sdef n="indecl" /> 

    <sdef n="prn" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="ind"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="det"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="dem"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="def"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="qnt"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="rel"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="itg"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="neg"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="ref" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pprep" c="Pre-prepositional"/> 
    <sdef n="p1" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="p2" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="p3" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pr" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="adv" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pos" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="ij" 	c=""/> 

    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="дієслово"/> 
    <sdef n="vbser" 	c="дієслово бути"/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="дієслово мати"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"   c="модальне дієслово"/>
    <sdef n="impf" 	c="недоконаний вид"/> 
    <sdef n="perf"  c="доконаний вид"/>
    <sdef n="dual" 	c="недоконаний і доконаний вид"/>
    <sdef n="tv"    c="перехідне дієслово"/>
    <sdef n="iv"    c="неперехідне дієслово"/>
    <sdef n="fut" 	c="майбутній час"/> 
    <sdef n="pres"  c="теперішній час"/> 
    <sdef n="pers"  c=""/> 
    <sdef n="past"  c="минулий час"/> 
    <sdef n="nonpast"  c="Present/future form for dual aspect verbs"/> 
    <sdef n="cni"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="imp"   c="наказовий спосіб"/> 
    <sdef n="impers"  c=""/> 
    <sdef n="inf"   c="Інфінітив"/> 
    <sdef n="pp"    c=""/> 
    <sdef n="psv"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pprs"  c=""/> 
    <sdef n="act"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="actv"  c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pasv" 	c=""/> 

    <sdef n="num"   c="числівник"/> 
    <sdef n="ord" 	c=""/> 

    <sdef n="np" 	  c=""/>
    <sdef n="top" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="ant" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="cog" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="hyd"   c=""/>
    <sdef n="org"   c=""/>
    <sdef n="al" 	c=""/>

    <sdef n="cmp" 	c="Non-last part of compound adjective"/> 
    <sdef n="sint" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative degree"/> 
    <sdef n="sup" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="sent" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="sp" 	  c=""/> 
    <sdef n="vaux" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="part"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="pred"  c=""/>

    <sdef n="cm"         c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"       c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"       c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"      c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"      c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio"       c="Hyphen"/>

  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)? ?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><i>-</i><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[:.][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quantitats">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>км</l><r><b/>км<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>мм</l><r><b/>мм<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>см</l><r><b/>см<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>кг</l><r><b/>kг<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guio">
      <e><re>[—\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>[«]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[»]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="км__abbr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="BASE__англійськ/ий">
  <e>       <p><l>ий</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ого</l>       <r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ому</l>       <r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ий</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ого</l>       <r><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>им</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ім</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ому</l>       <r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ий</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l>         <r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ої</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ій</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l>         <r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ою</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ій</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l>         <r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l>         <r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ого</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ому</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l>         <r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>им</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ім</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ому</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l>         <r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>их</l>        <r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>им</l>        <r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="mfn"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>их</l>        <r><s n="mfn"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ими</l>       <r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>их</l>        <r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

  <e lm="км"><i>км</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
  <e lm="мм"><i>мм</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
  <e lm="кг"><i>кг</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
  <e lm="мг"><i>мг</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="guio"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
